Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1587.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 74.2 of Title 74, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. This act shall be known and may be cited as the “Government


Service Delivery Improvement Act”.


B. As used in this section:


1. “Agency” means any board, commission, department, authority,


bureau, office, or other entity created with the authority to make

Req. No. 3420 Page 1


rules or formulate orders as defined in the Administrative


Procedures Act, as well as any correctional institution or other


type of institution;


2. “Government service delivery” means:


a. any action by an agency related to providing a benefit


or service to a state resident, business, or


organization, including, but not limited to, a grantee


or a state, county, municipal, or tribal entity, or


b. any such action by a contractor or nonprofit


organization acting on behalf of an agency or


administering a state-funded program;


3. “Government service delivery channel” means the way an


individual or entity significantly interacts with or engages with


state government, including, but not limited to, such interaction


by:


a. mail,


b. digital service,


c. telephone,


d. a contact center,


e. a website,


f. outreach and communication,


g. collaboration with a third party, or





Req. No. 3420 Page 2


h. any other way in which an individual or entity


significantly interacts with or engages with state


government;


4. “High-impact service program” means an agency program


identified by the Director of the Office of Management and


Enterprise Services as such due to the scale and impact of the


public-facing services of such program; and


5. “High-impact service provider” means an agency providing a


high-impact service program.


C. The Director of the Office of Management and Enterprise


Services shall designate or appoint the State of Oklahoma Government


Service Delivery Lead within the Office of Management and Enterprise


Services, who shall:


1. Coordinate and facilitate statewide efforts to improve


government service delivery by agencies, particularly with respect


to high-impact service programs and providers;


2. Carry out the duties and powers granted to him or her by the


Director;


3. Serve as the lead statewide official responsible for


supporting government service delivery;


4. Advise the Director concerning the improvement of government


service delivery by agencies;


5. Collaborate with lead agency service delivery officials, and


any other agency officials as appropriate, to develop and oversee

Req. No. 3420 Page 3


the implementation of statewide government service delivery


standards, policies, and guidelines, including standards, policies,


and guidelines to:


a. understand the needs of an individual or entity


interacting with an agency,


b. solicit and consider feedback on government service


delivery by an agency,


c. examine government service delivery processes,


d. assess how the factors of ease, efficiency,


transparency, accessibility, fairness, burden, and


duration, including wait and processing times, impact


government service delivery, and


e. encourage the adoption of products, services, and


procedures to enhance the efficacy of government


service delivery and the satisfaction of individuals


or entities interacting with an agency;


6. Collect and report qualitative and quantitative information


or data on government service delivery through existing reporting


mechanisms;


7. Evaluate the quality of government service delivery,


including through the establishment of performance metrics developed


using the standards, policies, and guidelines provided for in


paragraph 5 of this subsection and the information or data collected


pursuant to paragraph 6 of this subsection; and

Req. No. 3420 Page 4


8. Engage with stakeholders to identify practices to improve


government service delivery by agencies.


D. 1. The director of each agency shall be responsible for the


implementation of government service delivery by the agency and


shall seek to enhance such delivery to better achieve the mission of


the agency and maintain trust, transparency, and accountability with


those interacting with the agency.


2. No later than one hundred eighty (180) days after the


effective date of this act, the director of each agency shall


designate or appoint a lead agency service delivery official, who


shall:


a. report directly to the director of the agency, or a


designee,


b. possess sufficient operational authority to carry out


the implementation of government service delivery


improvements within the agency,


c. as appropriate and at the direction of the director of


the agency, coordinate and execute efforts to improve


and enhance the government service delivery and


channels of the agency,


d. at the direction of the State of Oklahoma Government


Service Delivery Lead, submit an implementation plan


for improving the agency’s government service delivery


and channels,

Req. No. 3420 Page 5


e. coordinate the collection and reporting of information


and data on government service delivery within the


agency,


f. facilitate collaboration within the agency and, as


appropriate, with other agencies in coordination with


the State of Oklahoma Government Service Delivery


Lead, to improve and enhance government service


delivery, and


g. assist in the incorporation of the government service


delivery standards, policies, and guidelines provided


for in paragraph 5 of subsection C of this section.


E. The Director of the Office of Management and Enterprise


Services shall, no later than ninety (90) days prior to the


beginning of the annual legislative session, electronically submit


to the President Pro Tempore of the Senate, the Speaker of the House


of Representatives, and the Governor a report on statewide efforts


to improve government service delivery by agencies.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.




60-2-3420 MSBB 1/13/2026 10:18:25 AM









Req. No. 3420 Page 6